District of Columbia statutes.
2-356.02

Source selection methods assigned to project delivery methods.

(a)

This section specifies the source selection methods applicable to procurements for the project delivery methods identified in § 2-356.01, except as provided in §§ 2-354.04, 2-354.05, 2-354.07, 2-354.08, 2-354.11, and 2-354.12.

(b)

(1)

The qualifications-based selection process set forth in § 2-356.04 shall be used to procure architectural and engineering services in design-bid-build procurements.

(2)

Competitive sealed bidding, as set forth in § 2-354.02, shall be used to procure construction in design-bid-build procurements, except where rules authorize the use of competitive sealed proposals, as set forth in § 2-354.03, for contracts for construction management at-risk.

(c)

Contracts for operations and maintenance shall be procured as set forth in § 2-354.01.

(d)

Contracts for design-build shall be procured by competitive sealed proposals, as set forth in § 2-354.03.

(e)

Contracts for design-build-operate-maintain shall be procured by competitive sealed proposals, as set forth in § 2-354.03.

(f)

Contracts for design-build-finance-operate-maintain shall be procured by competitive sealed proposals, as set forth in § 2-354.03.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 602, 58 DCR 1185

History

Stadiums, construction, see §§ 10-1601.03, 10-1601.05.

Cross References